Utah statutes.
11-13-220.   Qualifications of officers or employees performing services
under agreements.
Other provisions of law which require an officer or employee of a public
agency to be an elector or resident of the public agency or to have other
qualifications not generally applicable to all of the contracting agencies in
order to qualify for that office or employment are not applicable to officers
or employees who hold office or perform services for more than one public
agency pursuant to agreements executed under this chapter.
